Utah statutes.
34-32-2.   Assignments to farm organizations -- Effect.

Whenever any producer of farm products within the state executes and delivers to a dealer or processor of farm products, either as a clause in a sales agreement or other instrument in writing, whereby such processor or dealer is directed to deduct a sum or a rate not exceeding 3% of the price to be paid for any such produce, such processor or dealer shall deduct from the price to be paid for any farm product being sold by any such producer to any such processor or dealer, the amount so authorized and the producer or dealer shall pay the same to a farm organization as assignee.

